Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 51

Transfers Of Property

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

28-51-101. No priority between real and personal property.

In determining what property of the estate shall be sold, mortgaged, leased, or exchanged for any purpose provided in §28-51-103, there shall be no priority as between real and personal property except as provided by the will, if any, or by order of the court or by the provisions of §28-53-107.

It shall not be necessary that assets of either class, real or personal, other than cash assets, be exhausted before resorting to an asset of the other class for the accomplishment of any purpose enumerated in §28-51-103.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 124; 1961, No. 424, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2701.

28-51-102. Grant of power in will.

When power to sell, mortgage, lease, or exchange property of the estate has been given to a personal representative under the terms of a will, the personal representative may proceed under the power, or, consistent with the provisions of the will, may proceed under the provisions of the Probate Code, as he or she may determine.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 126; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2703.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

28-51-103. Transfers pursuant to court orders.

Real or personal property belonging to an estate may be sold, mortgaged, leased, or exchanged under court order when necessary for any of the following purposes:

For the payment of claims;

For the payment of a legacy given by the will of the decedent;

For the preservation or protection of assets of the estate;

For making distribution of the estate or any part thereof; or

For any other purpose in the best interest of the estate.

In the event the selection of property of the estate to be sold for any of the purposes enumerated in subsection (a) of this section results in a discrimination against the distributees of the property ordered sold, the court, in the distribution of the estate, shall order contribution to be made between the respective distributees in such manner as to equitably distribute the burden of payment of claims and to avoid an infringement of the substantive rights of the distributees of the estate.

Real or personal property specifically devised or bequeathed shall not be sold for the purpose of the payment of claims if other assets of the estate are available.

An order authorizing a personal representative to sell, mortgage, or lease real or personal property for the payment of obligations of the estate shall not be granted if any of the persons interested in the estate shall execute and file in the court a bond in a sum and with sureties as the court may approve, conditioned as the court may direct, to preserve the rights and equities of all interested persons, within such time as the court shall direct. An action may be maintained on the bond by the personal representative on behalf of any interested person who is prejudiced by breach of any obligation of the bond.

Upon the petition of a creditor or other interested person, the court shall require the personal representative to show cause why he or she should not proceed to sell, mortgage, or lease specific property of the estate for a purpose enumerated in subsection (a) of this section.

If, after a hearing, the court finds it to be advantageous to the estate or necessary for the protection of the rights of interested persons, the court shall order the personal representative to proceed with the sale, mortgage, or lease of the property.

An order of a probate court directing a sale of land of an estate to pay off a debt secured by a mortgage on land of an estate could not be collaterally attacked because the debt was not probated nor because there were sufficient personal assets in the administrator's hands to pay debts without selling the land. Long v. Hoffman, 103 Ark. 574, 148 S.W. 245 (1912) (decision under prior law).

A judgment of a probate court allowing a claim could not be attacked on the ground that the claim was not presented to the administrator before allowance a collateral proceeding upon a petition for the sale of real estate to satisfy the claim. Watkins v. Reed-Harlan Grocery Co., 195 Ark. 905, 115 S.W.2d 277 (1938) (decision under prior law).

Sales of lands to pay a decedent's debts could only be ordered by a probate court; equity could not interfere. Turner v. Rogers, 49 Ark. 51, 4 S.W. 193 (1886) (decision under prior law).

When lands, which had previously been purchased from the heirs of a decedent, were ordered to be sold by a probate court for the payment of debts, the purchaser could, by a bill in equity, compel the administrator to marshal the assets by first selling other lands and property. Garibaldi v. Jones, 48 Ark. 230, 2 S.W. 844 (1887) (decision under prior law).

An order to sell land for the payment of debts, procured by fraud, would not be set aside unless the purchaser at the sale participated in or had notice of the fraud. Adams v. Thomas, 44 Ark. 267 (1884) (decision under prior law).

Where an administrator, without compliance with statutes relating to the sale of a decedent's realty for payment of debts, sold realty to an attorney who had prepared the petition for sale and who purchased it for the administrator's wife, and after payment of the widow's share and fee to attorney, the administrator retained the balance as his fee, though no actual fraud appeared to have been contemplated, legal fraud, warranting setting aside the probate court's judgment and the sale resting thereon, was held sufficiently established. Crider v. Simmons, 192 Ark. 1075, 96 S.W.2d 471 (1936) (decision under prior law).

An heir or devisee took an estate subject to the debts of the deceased and could transfer to another no greater right than he himself possessed. Howell v. Duke, 40 Ark. 102 (1882) (decision under prior law).

The right of sale accrued upon the discharge of an administrator and was barred in ten years. Brown v. Hanauer, 48 Ark. 277, 3 S.W. 27 (1886), overruled in part, Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973) (decision under prior law).

A delay of 20 years after grant of letters of administration before applying for an order of sale to pay probated claims was not unreasonable when the application was made as soon as the widow died. Killough v. Hinton, 54 Ark. 65, 14 S.W. 1092 (1890) (decision under prior law).

Although it is an established rule that the right to sell is lost by “gross laches” or “unreasonable delay,” there is no uniform rule for determining what constitutes unreasonable delay or gross negligence. Roth v. Holland, 56 Ark. 633, 20 S.W. 521 (1892) (decision under prior law).

Unnecessary delay for a period of over seven years on the part of a creditor in procuring letters of administration to be issued upon the estate of his debtor was such laches as would defeat an application to sell lands of the estate which had been in the possession of the heirs during that period. Roth v. Holland, 56 Ark. 633, 20 S.W. 521 (1892) (decision under prior law).

A delay of more than seven years after the grant of letters of administration before attempting to subject land to payment of debts without other excuse than that the values of real estate were declining was such laches as barred relief even though the administrator, who was one of the heirs, consented to the delay. Brogan v. Brogan, 63 Ark. 405, 39 S.W. 58 (1897) (decision under prior law).

A delay of more than seven years with no other excuse than that the lands were subject to overflow was laches which would bar an application to sell interest of infant heir, but would not bar an action as to interest of an heir who was an administrator during such period and was chiefly responsible for the delay. Black v. Robinson, 70 Ark. 185, 68 S.W. 489 (1902) (decision under prior law).

Twelve years would not bar the right to sell lands under circumstances excusing the delay. Mayo v. Mayo, 79 Ark. 570, 96 S.W. 165 (1906) (decision under prior law).

Neither three years nor seven years would bar the right to sell lands to pay the debts of an estate. Brown v. Nelms, 86 Ark. 368, 112 S.W. 373 (1908) (decision under prior law).

A probate court can authorize the mortgage of property held by an estate for the purpose of refinancing a loan to a federal land bank even though this section does not specifically so state, since a court is entitled to authorize the mortgaging of property “for any purpose in the best interest of the estate.” National Bank v. Young, 220 Ark. 498, 248 S.W.2d 375 (1952).

The purpose of the legislature in enacting this section was to extend the power of the probate court to authorize mortgaging of property held by an estate rather than to restrict its authority. National Bank v. Young, 220 Ark. 498, 248 S.W.2d 375 (1952).

Where an order was entered by the probate court which authorized the executor to borrow funds for purposes which fell within those permissible listed in this section, the mortgaged land became an asset in the hands of the executor and subject to the probate court's jurisdiction under §28-49-101(b)(1). Rowland v. Farm Credit Bank, 41 Ark. App. 79, 848 S.W.2d 433 (1993).

Where the court authorized the mortgaging of real estate which was an asset in the hands of the executor, for purposes which were not themselves authorized by statute, it did not serve to oust the court of jurisdiction or to render its order void and subject to collateral attack. Rowland v. Farm Credit Bank, 41 Ark. App. 79, 848 S.W.2d 433 (1993).

When a probate court finds that the real estate of a decedent should be sold for any purpose enumerated in this section, the real estate becomes an asset in the hands of the personal representative and is not subject to the jurisdiction of a court of equity for partition. Doss v. Taylor, 244 Ark. 252, 424 S.W.2d 541 (1968).

A probate court's authority to order a sale does not encompass the power to order a partition, which is preferably accomplished by a division in kind. Gibson v. Gibson, 266 Ark. 622, 589 S.W.2d 1 (1979).

Circuit court's refusal to hear a real estate agent's testimony was not error where information about the results of a judicial sale versus a private sale was already known to the court, there was other evidence of the client's efforts to sell the property, and thus, the agent's testimony would have added little to the court's deliberations as to whether to order a public sale.Howard v. Adams, 2016 Ark. App. 222, 490 S.W.3d 678 (2016).

The fact that creditors petitioning the probate court for the sale of a decedent's land for payment of his debts to them were themselves suing the estate for an undivided half of the lands was no ground for the denial of their petition; however, the court could, in its discretion, suspend the proceedings until the litigation as to the title was ended. Grider v. Apperson & Co., 38 Ark. 388 (1882) (decision under prior law).

The allowance of a claim by a probate court, the closing of the administration, and the discharge of the administrator without payment laid the foundation for subjecting a decedent's lands in the possession of his heirs to the payment of a claim. Brown v. Hanauer, 48 Ark. 277, 3 S.W. 27 (1886), overruled in part, Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973) (decision under prior law).

A court properly gave a trustee an opportunity to preserve a trust intact, if reasonably possible, by raising money to pay debts of a decedent's estate. Gaither v. Hobgood, 235 Ark. 777, 362 S.W.2d 18 (1962).

The death of a decedent fixes a lien upon his lands for the payment of his debts and they pass to his heirs or devisees charged with such debts; and where a creditor's debt has been duly probated and not paid, or has come into existence too late to be probated or after the administration has been closed, he may in equity subject lands in the hands of the heirs or devisees or their alienees to the payment of the debt. Hall v. Brewer, 40 Ark. 433 (1883) (decision under prior law).

The claims of creditors of an estate were paramount to those of distributees, and the latter can assert no claims to assets where they are needed to pay creditors. State ex rel. McCreary v. Roth, 47 Ark. 222, 1 S.W. 98 (1886) (decision under prior law).

A purchaser at a void administrator's sale was subrogated to a creditor's rights. Bond v. Montgomery, 56 Ark. 563, 20 S.W. 525 (1892); Harris v. Watson, 56 Ark. 574, 20 S.W. 529 (1892) (decisions under prior law).

An application had to be made to the court for the county “in which the personal representative was qualified.” Gordon v. Howell, 35 Ark. 381 (1880) (decision under prior law).

Application for a sale must be made only for certain purposes and by the personal representative, not by the widow. Gibson v. Gibson, 266 Ark. 622, 589 S.W.2d 1 (1979).

The proceeding described in former similar statute applied to sales for the payment of purchase money as well as for the payment of debts generally. Montgomery v. Johnson, 31 Ark. 74 (1876) (decision under prior law).

Trial court's order to authorize the sale of real estate in probate proceedings was supported by an estate administrator's testimony that the administrator spent the administrator's own funds to keep up the property and that the rental income was not sufficient to pay for all of the necessary repairs and expenses.Rice v. Seals, 2010 Ark. App. 393, 377 S.W.3d 416 (2010).

When there were no debts due by a decedent, there could be no sale of lands to pay the expenses of administration had thereon. When application was made to sell lands solely for the expense of administering the estate, it had to be made to appear that the expenses were incurred in the course of administering to pay the debts due personally by the decedent. Mays v. Rogers, 52 Ark. 320, 12 S.W. 579 (1889); Collins v. Paepcke-Leicht Lumber Co., 74 Ark. 81, 74 Ark. 82, 84 S.W. 1044 (1905); Flowers v. Reece, 92 Ark. 611, 123 S.W. 773 (1909) (decisions under prior law).

Real property of an estate may be sold for purposes other than to pay debts. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Cited: Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979); Brown v. Kennedy Well Works, Inc., 302 Ark. 213, 788 S.W.2d 948 (1990).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 127-129; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2704 — 62-2706.

Partition.

28-51-104. Sale of a homestead.

The homestead of a decedent, while it remains the homestead of his or her spouse or minor children, shall not be sold by a personal representative for the payment of debts of the decedent.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 125; 1981, No. 714, § 72; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2702.

28-51-105. Terms of sale.

In all sales of real or personal property, the court may authorize credit to be extended by the personal representative for a period not exceeding ten (10) years from the date of the sale and for an amount not exceeding ninety percent (90%) of the purchase price, the payment of which shall be secured by retention of title or reservation of a vendor's lien and in addition may be secured by notes or bonds with sureties approved by the personal representative, subject to the control of the court.

If credit is authorized, the order shall specify the time of payment, the minimum rate of interest on deferred payments, and the manner in which the payments shall be secured.

However, the extension of credit shall not extend or prohibit the closing of the estate if all other pertinent matters before the estate have been resolved to the court's satisfaction.

Ark. L. Rev.

Haught, 1988 Update to the Arkansas Probate System: An Overview of Recent Developments in Arkansas Probate Practice, 42 Ark. L. Rev. 631.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Probate, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 599.

A probate court did not abuse its discretion in refusing to set aside a sale of vacant lots by a guardian at $50.00 an acre offered by the buyer and appraised by persons suggested by the buyer merely because there had been a recent development in addition. Hamilton v. Northwest Land Co., 223 Ark. 831, 268 S.W.2d 877 (1954).

Cited: Doss v. Taylor, 244 Ark. 252, 424 S.W.2d 541 (1968).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 130; 1983, No. 658, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2707.

28-51-106. Purchase by personal representative.

A personal representative shall not purchase property of the estate unless sold at public sale and approved by the court after a hearing on confirmation of the sale, notice of the hearing having been given to the distributees, and then only if the personal representative is a spouse, parent, descendant, brother, or sister of the decedent, or at the time of the sale is, and at the time of the death of the decedent was, the owner of an interest in the property.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 131; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2708.

28-51-107. Purchase by holder of lien.

At any sale of real or personal property upon which there is a mortgage, pledge, or other lien, the holder thereof may become the purchaser and, unless the property is being sold subject to the lien, may apply the amount of his or her lien on the purchase price in the following manner:

If no claim thereon has been filed or allowed, the court, at the hearing on the report of sale and for confirmation of the sale, may examine the validity and enforceability of the lien or charge and the amount due thereunder and secured thereby and may authorize the personal representative to accept the receipt of the purchaser for the amount due thereunder and secured thereby as payment pro tanto.

If the mortgage, pledge, or other lien is a valid claim against the estate and has been allowed, the receipt of the purchaser for the amount due him or her from the proceeds of the sale is a payment pro tanto.

Nothing permitted under the terms of this section shall be deemed to be an allowance of a claim based upon the mortgage, pledge, or other lien.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 132; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2709.

28-51-108. Exchange of property.

Whenever it shall appear upon the petition of the personal representative or of an interested person to be for the best interest of the estate to exchange any real or personal property of the estate for other property, the court may authorize the exchange upon such terms and conditions as it may direct, which may include the payment or receipt of money by the personal representative. Upon the exchange of personal property or real property, the proceedings for the sale of the respective kinds of property shall be followed as far as applicable.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 146; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2723.

28-51-109. Validity of proceedings — Appeals.

The findings of fact and conclusions of law essential to the validity of a sale, mortgage, lease, exchange, or conveyance of property of an estate by a personal representative, as contained in an order authorizing the sale or other disposition, or in an order confirming the sale or other disposition of property, shall not be subject to collateral attack.

However, on appeal from an order of confirmation, the party appealing may have appellate review not only of the order of confirmation, but also the original order authorizing the sale, mortgage, lease, exchange, or conveyance, although the time as otherwise provided for appeal from the order has elapsed.

Sales or conveyances of property by a personal representative by proceedings not in substantial compliance with the provisions of the Probate Code shall be void.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

The probate court was held to be a court of superior jurisdiction, and when acting within its jurisdictional rights, its judgments were not open to collateral attack if they contained the proper recitals and were not procured by fraud. Levinson v. Treadway, 190 Ark. 201, 78 S.W.2d 59 (1935) (decision under prior law).

As to past sales, former statute was sustained as a statute of limitations, and as to future sales, it was valid as prescribing the recital of facts which were essential to confer jurisdiction on a probate court to make such a sale impervious to attack on account of omission of other requirements which were not jurisdictional. Day v. Johnston, 158 Ark. 478, 250 S.W. 532 (1923) (decision under prior law).

A sale in this state was void where the appointment of a foreign guardian was not legally made. Landreth v. Henson, 116 Ark. 361, 173 S.W. 427 (1915) (decision under prior law).

Where an administrator, without compliance with statutes relating to sale of a decedent's realty for payment of debts, sold realty to an attorney who had prepared the petition for sale and who purchased it for the administrator's wife, and after payment of the widow's share and fee to attorney, the administrator retained the balance as his fee, though no actual fraud appeared to have been contemplated, legal fraud warranting setting aside the probate court's judgment and the sale resting thereon was sufficiently established. Crider v. Simmons, 192 Ark. 1075, 96 S.W.2d 471 (1936) (decision under prior law).

A guardian's sale of a ward's land was not invalid because the guardian failed to account for the proceeds of the sale or because part of the purchase money was paid by crediting thereon a debt for supplies furnished for the benefit of the ward. Harper v. Smith, 89 Ark. 284, 116 S.W. 674 (1909) (decision under prior law).

A guardian's deed executed under an order of a probate court to a minor's land was void where it conceded that the land was sold for less than the appraised value. Mobbs v. Millard, 106 Ark. 563, 153 S.W. 821 (1913) (decision under prior law).

A sale of land of a nonresident minor made by a guardian without notice or appraisement was voidable, though it was approved by the probate court. Ingraham v. Baum, 136 Ark. 101, 206 S.W. 67 (1918) (decision under prior law).

A guardian's sale of the land of minors was void where one tract of land was described in the application and the order of sale and another tract was described in the appraisement and sold, although the report of the sale was confirmed by the court. Jones v. McDaniel, 137 Ark. 1, 203 S.W. 693 (1918) (decision under prior law).

An order of a probate court directing the sale of an insane adult's interest in a certain lot, meeting the requirements of former statute, was impervious to a collateral attack, in the absence of fraud or duress. Tuchfeld v. Hamilton, 203 Ark. 428, 156 S.W.2d 887 (1941) (decision under prior law).

Where a probate court ordered the sale of decedent's lands, but the order did not recite the necessity thereof, it would be presumed that the petition which formed the basis of the court's order, and the evidence adduced to support the petition, showed every fact which was essential to give the court jurisdiction to make the order of sale. But the rule was different where the judgment of the probate court was rendered in a proceeding not in accord with its statutory jurisdiction or according to the course of the common law, but concerning a subject-matter the jurisdiction of which was conferred by special statutes. Kulbeth v. Drew County Timber Co., 125 Ark. 291, 188 S.W. 810 (1916) (decision under prior law).

In proceedings by a guardian to sell the homestead of her wards, the omission of an order of sale to show that there were no debts due and unpaid by their deceased parents at the time of the sale was cured by former statute. Collins v. Harris, 167 Ark. 372, 267 S.W. 781 (1925) (decision under prior law).

The legislature could not cure a sale of a minor's homestead to pay debts of a deceased. Hart v. Wimberly, 173 Ark. 1083, 296 S.W. 39 (1927) (decision under prior law).

The sale of a minor's homestead to pay the debts of a decedent being void as not within the jurisdiction of a probate court was not cured by former statute. Hart v. Wimberly, 173 Ark. 1083, 296 S.W. 39 (1927) (decision under prior law).

Former statute was held not to validate a void guardian's sale of a minor's homestead where a probate court judgment did not contain a recital that the sale was conducted according to law and that the facts set forth in the petition entitled the guardian to make the sale. Dodd v. Hopper, 182 Ark. 24, 30 S.W.2d 837 (1930) (decision under prior law).

The failure in a guardian's petition for the sale of minor's land to allege that it was not the homestead of the minors was a mere irregularity which would be cured under the provisions of former statute. Jordan v. Midland Savs. & Loan Co., 193 Ark. 313, 99 S.W.2d 260 (1936) (decision under prior law).

A private sale made by an administrator without the authority of the court should not have been confirmed. Gibbs v. Singfield, 115 Ark. 385, 171 S.W. 144 (1914) (decision under prior law).

Judgments of the probate court were impervious to collateral attack if they contained the jurisdictional recitals which the general assembly had determined were essential to a valid sale against collateral attack, and private sales made under orders of the court containing jurisdictional recitals of statutory requirements of a valid sale were not void when confirmed and were subject to attack only on direct appeal. Day v. Johnston, 158 Ark. 478, 250 S.W. 532 (1923); Fisher v. Cowan, 205 Ark. 722, 170 S.W.2d 603 (1943) (decisions under prior law).

Former statute was not applicable to probate sales where order did not contain the required recital. Watson v. Lester, 182 Ark. 386, 31 S.W.2d 955 (1930) (decision under prior law).

A probate court's judgment confirming assignment of an interest in insurance policy, though not containing the recitals required by former statute, was erroneously quashed by circuit court upon the petition of an insurance company having no interest in the estate and disclaiming liability. Golightly v. New York Life Ins. Co., 196 Ark. 1024, 120 S.W.2d 697 (1938) (decision under prior law).

Notwithstanding that a probate court had confirmed the sale of a minor's land, the court could, on appeal, inquire whether the provisions of a statute concerning probate sales had been substantially complied with. Simmons v. A.C. Carter & Co., 125 Ark. 547, 189 S.W. 176 (1916) (decision under prior law).

Heir's failure to act in substantial compliance with the Probate Code required the court to hold that her disposition of the property was void; she was never appointed as administrator, the decedent's will was never admitted or declared valid, and appellants never received notice of the collection of the small estate, and the administrator's deed was void.Bryant v. Osborn, 2014 Ark. 143 (2014).

Former statute did not mean that defects in the allowance of claims against an estate would avoid a sale of real estate. Brown v. Nelms, 86 Ark. 368, 112 S.W. 373 (1908) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Reichenbach v. Kizer, 174 B.R. 997 (Bankr. E.D. Ark 1994).

The court shall prescribe safeguards to assure that the sale, mortgage, lease, or exchange is for an adequate consideration and for the best interest of the estate.

The court, in its discretion, may require confirmation of any sale or other disposition of personal property.

The assignment by an administrator of a judgment belonging to the intestate, made privately and without an order of a court, was void. Winningham v. Holloway, 51 Ark. 385, 11 S.W. 579 (1889) (decision under prior law).

To the extent that Francis v. Turner, 188 Ark. 158, 67 S.W.2d 211 (1933), stands for the proposition that the marital property law of the situs as opposed to the domicile applies to movable personal property, it is overruled. Morris v. Cullipher, 306 Ark. 646, 816 S.W.2d 878 (1991).

An administrator sold chattels on a credit, under reservation of title, at his own peril, and he was responsible for loss by his failure to comply with the statutes. Pierce v. Whipple, 123 Ark. 132, 184 S.W. 837 (1916) (decision under prior law).

An executor or administrator to whom notes were executed for personal property and rent of land of a deceased held them in a fiduciary capacity and had no power, by assignment, to appropriate them to the payment of one creditor to exclusion of others. Payne, Huntington & Co. v. Flournoy, 29 Ark. 500 (1874) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 133; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2710.

Subchapter 2

— Personal Property

28-51-201. Sale, mortgage, lease, or exchange.

The petition of a personal representative for authority to sell, mortgage, lease, or exchange personal property of an estate shall be heard without notice, or upon such notice as the court may direct.

The court, if satisfied as to the necessity or desirability of the action, may order the personal representative to proceed with the sale or other disposition at public or private sale and upon terms and conditions as by the court may be specifically directed.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 134; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2711.

28-51-202. Sale of perishable property.

Perishable personal property may be sold by the personal representative without an order of the court. However, the personal representative shall be responsible for the actual value of the property unless he or she shall promptly file a report of the sale and obtain the court's approval.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 135; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2712.

28-51-203. Sale, mortgage, or lease of real and personal property as a unit.

Whenever in the discretion of the court it is for the best interest of the estate, real and personal property of the estate may be sold, mortgaged, or leased as a unit, but the provisions of the Probate Code with respect to the sale, mortgage, or lease of real property shall apply.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 136; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2713.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Subchapter 3

— Real Property Interests

Cross References. Life interests and remainders, determination of present value, §18-2-101 et seq.

Publication of notice, §16-3-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1951, No. 255, § 15: Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly has ascertained that there is a likelihood of misconstruction of certain provisions of the Probate Code, and that an urgent need exists for clarification thereof and certain additions thereto in order that the law relating to proceedings in probate may be construed and administered in a uniform manner throughout the State, in accordance with the legislative intent; for the accomplishment of which purposes this Act is adopted. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, welfare and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”